Utah statutes.
20A-11-1304.   School board office candidate -- Financial reporting requirements -- Termination of duty to report.

(1)  Each school board candidate is subject to interim reporting requirements until the candidate withdraws or is eliminated in a primary.

(2)  Each school board office candidate is subject to year-end summary reporting requirements until the candidate has filed a statement of dissolution with the lieutenant governor stating that:

(a)  the school board office candidate is no longer receiving contributions and is no longer making expenditures;

(b)  the ending balance on the last summary report filed is zero and the balance in the separate bank account required in Section 20A-11-1301 is zero; and

(c)  a final summary report in the form required by Section 20A-11-1302 showing a zero balance is attached to the statement of dissolution.

(3)  A statement of dissolution and a final summary report may be filed at any time.

(4)  Each school board office candidate shall continue to file the year-end summary report required by Section 20A-11-1302 until the statement of dissolution and final summary report required by this section are filed.



Enacted by Chapter 355, 1997 General Session

